Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-595
Public power supplier; limitation on retail services.

(1) A public power supplier shall not provide on a retail basis any broadband services, Internet services, telecommunications services, or video services.

(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to services which a public power supplier was authorized to provide and was providing prior to January 1, 2005.

Laws 2005, LB 645, § 3.